bg-BG: Размер на опората за ръката: Двойно екстра голям (XXL); Екстра голям (XL); Екстра малък (XS); Голям (L); Среден (M); Универсален размер; Малък (S); Друго
fi: Käsituen koko: Kaksois-erikoissuuri (XXL); Erikoissuuri (XL); Erikoispieni (XS); Suuri (L); Keskikoko (M); Yksi koko; Pieni (S); Muu
pl: Rozmiar wsparcia dłoni: Podwójnie bardzo duży (XXL); Bardzo duży (XL); Bardzo mały (XS); Duży (L); Średni (M); Rozmiar uniwersalny; Mały (S); Inne
ru: Размер поддержки руки: Двойной очень большой (XXL); Очень большой (XL); Очень маленький (XS); Большой (L); Средний (M); Единый размер; Маленький (S); Другое
ko: 손 보호대 크기: 더블 엑스트라 라지(XXL); 엑스트라 라지(XL); 엑스트라 스몰(XS); 라지(L); 미디엄(M); 원사이즈; 스몰(S); 기타
pt-PT: Tamanho do apoio para as mãos: Duplo extragrande (XXL); Extragrande (XL); Extrapequeno (XS); Grande (L); Médio (M); Tamanho único; Pequeno (S); Outro
de: Empfohlen für Handgröße: Doppel-Extragroß (XXL); Extragroß (XL); Extraklein (XS); Groß (L); Mittel (M); Einheitsgröße; Klein (S); Sonstige
th: ขนาดของอุปกรณ์พยุงมือ: ใหญ่พิเศษ 2 เท่า (XXL); ใหญ่พิเศษ (XL); เล็กพิเศษ (XS); ใหญ่ (L); กลาง (M); ฟรีไซซ์; เล็ก (S); อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Velikost podpore za roko: Dvojno zelo veliko (XXL); Zelo veliko (XL); Zelo majhno (XS); Veliko (L); Srednje (M); Ena velikost; Majhno (S); Drugo
sv: Storlek på handstöd: Double extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); One size; Small (S); Övrigt
es: Tipo de soporte de la mano: Doble extra grande (XXL); Extra grande (XL); Extra pequeña (XS); Grande (L); Mediana (M); Talla única; Pequeña (S); Otra
da: Håndstøttestørrelse: Dobbelt ekstra large (XXL); Ekstra large (XL); Ekstra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); One size; Small (S); Andet
it: Taglia del supporto per la mano: Doppia extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Taglia unica; Small (S); Altro
fr: Dimensions du repose-main: Double très grand (XXL); Très grand (XL); Très petit (XS); Grand (L); Moyen (M); Taille unique; Petit (S); Autre
sk-SK: Veľkosť opierky na ruku: Dvojité extra veľké (XXL); Extra veľké (XL); Extra malé (XS); Veľké (L); Stredné (M); Univerzálna veľkosť; Malé (S); Iné
el: Μέγεθος στηρίγματος χεριού: Double extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Ένα μέγεθος; Small (S); Άλλο
nl: Ondersteuningsmaat handschoen: Extra extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); One size; Small (S); Overig
tr: El destek boyutu: Çift ekstra büyük (XXL); Ekstra büyük (XL); Ekstra küçük (XS); Büyük (L); Orta (M); Tek beden; Küçük (S); Diğer
en: Hand support size: Double extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); One size; Small (S); Other
zh-TW: 手部支撐尺寸: 雙加大 (XXL); 加大 (XL); 加小 (XS); 大 (L); 中 (M); 單一尺寸; 小 (S); 其他
cs: Velikost opěrky pro ruce: Dvojité extra velké (XXL); Extra velké (XL); Extra malé (XS); Velké (L); Střední (M); Univerzální; Malé (S); Jiná
vi: Kích thước băng bảo vệ tay: Rất rất lớn (XXL); Rất lớn (XL); Rất nhỏ (XS); Lớn (L); Trung bình (M); Một cỡ; Nhỏ (S); Khác
lt-LT: Rankos prilaikymo dydis: Labai labai didelis (XXL); Labai didelis (XL); Labai mažas (XS); Didelis (L); Vidutinis (M); Vieno dydžio; Mažas (S); Kita
nb: Støttestørrelse for hånd: Dobbel ekstra stor (XXL); Ekstra stor (XL); Ekstra liten (XS); Stor (L); Medium (M); Én størrelse; Liten (S); Annet
ro-RO: Dimensiune a suportului pentru mână: Dublu extra large (XXL); Foarte mare (XL); Foarte mic (XS); Mare (L); Mediu (M); Mărime universală; Mic (S); Altele
hr-HR: Veličina potpore za ruku: Dvostruko iznimno velika (XXL); Iznimno velika (XL); Iznimno mala (XS); Velika (L); Srednja (M); Univerzalna veličina; Mala (S); Ostalo
pt-BR: Tamanho de suporte para mãos: Extra extra grande (XXL); Extra grande (XL); Extra pequeno (XS); Grande (L); Médio (M); Tamanho único; Pequeno (S); Outro
ja: ハンドサポートサイズ: 2XL (XXL); XL; XS; L; M; ワンサイズ; S; その他
hu: Kéztámasz mérete: Dupla extra nagy (XXL); Extra nagy (XL); Extra kicsi (XS); Nagy (L); Közepes (M); Egyméretes; Kicsi (S); Egyéb
zh-CN: 手部支撑尺寸: 双加大码（XXL）; 加大码（XL）; 加小码（XS）; 大码（L）; 中码（M）; 均码; 小码（S）; 其他